California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
 probation officer, to refer the minor to a juvenile justice community resource program as defined in Article 5.2 (commencing with Section 1784) of Chapter 1 of Division 2.5, or to receive other evidence on its own motion or the motion of a parent or guardian for not to exceed 10 judicial days if the minor is detained during the continuance. If the minor is not detained, it may continue the hearing to a date not later than 30 days after the date of filing of the petition. The court may, for good cause shown continue the hearing for an additional 15 days, if the minor is not detained. The court may make such order for detention of the minor or his or her release from detention, during the period of the continuance, as is appropriate.

If the minor is found to have committed an offense which would in the case of an adult be punishable alternatively as a felony or a misdemeanor, the court shall declare the offense to be a misdemeanor or felony.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1752, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

702.3.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law:

(a) When a minor denies, by a plea of not guilty by reason of insanity, the allegations of a petition filed pursuant to Section 602 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, and also joins with that denial a general denial of the conduct alleged in the petition, he or she shall first be subject to a hearing as if he or she had made no allegation of insanity. If the petition is sustained or if the minor denies the allegations only by reason of insanity, then a hearing shall be held on the question of whether the minor was insane at the time the offense
 was committed.

(b) If the court finds that the minor was insane at the time the offense was committed, the court, unless it appears to the court that the minor has fully recovered his or her sanity, shall direct that the minor be confined in a state hospital for the care and treatment of the mentally disordered or any other appropriate public or private mental health facility approved by the community program director, or the court may order the minor to undergo outpatient treatment as specified in Title 15 (commencing with Section 1600) of Part 2 of the Penal Code. The court shall transmit a copy of its order to the community program director or his or her designee. If the allegations of the petition specifying any felony are found to be true, the court shall direct that the minor be confined in a state hospital or other public or private mental health facility approved by the community program director for a minimum of 180 days, before the
 minor may be released on outpatient treatment. Prior to making the order directing that the minor be confined in a state hospital or other facility or ordered to undergo outpatient treatment, the court shall order the community program director or his or her designee to evaluate the minor and to submit to the court within 15 judicial days of the order his or her written recommendation as to whether the minor should be required to undergo outpatient treatment or committed to a state hospital or another mental health facility. If, however, it shall appear to the court that the minor has fully recovered his or her sanity the minor shall be remanded to the custody of the probation department until his or her sanity shall have been finally determined in the manner prescribed by law. A minor committed to a state hospital or other facility or ordered to undergo outpatient treatment shall not be released from confinement or the required outpatient treatment unless and until the court which committed him or her
 shall, after notice and hearing, in the manner provided in Section 1026.2 of the Penal Code, find and determine that his or her sanity has been restored.

(c) When the court, after considering the placement recommendation for the community program director required in subdivision (b), orders that the minor be confined in a state hospital or other public or private mental health facility, the court shall provide copies of the following documents which shall be taken with the minor to the state hospital or other treatment facility where the minor is to be confined:

(1) The commitment order, including a specification of the charges.

(2) The computation or statement setting forth the maximum time of commitment in accordance with Section 1026.5 and subdivision (e).

(3) A computation or statement setting forth the amount of credit, if any, to be deducted from the maximum term of commitment.

(4) State Summary Criminal History information.

(5) Any arrest or detention reports prepared by the police department or other law enforcement agency.

(6) Any court-ordered psychiatric examination or evaluation reports.

(7) The community program director’s placement recommendation report.

(d) The procedures set forth in Sections 1026, 1026.1, 1026.2, 1026.3, 1026.4, 1026.5, and 1027 of the Penal Code, and in Title 15 (commencing with Section 1600) of Part 2 of the Penal Code, shall be applicable to minors pursuant to this section, except that, in cases
 involving minors, the probation department rather than the sheriff, shall have jurisdiction over the minor.

(e) No minor may be committed pursuant to this section for a period longer than the jurisdictional limits of the juvenile court, pursuant to Section 607, unless, at the conclusion of the commitment, by reason of a mental disease, defect, or disorder, he or she represents a substantial danger of physical harm to others, in which case the commitment for care and treatment beyond the jurisdictional age may be extended by proceedings in superior court in accordance with and under the circumstances specified in subdivision (b) of Section 1026.5 of the Penal Code.

(f) The provision of a jury trial in superior court on the issue of extension of commitment shall not be construed to authorize the determination of any issue in juvenile court proceedings to be made by a
 jury.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 625, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

702.5.

In any hearing conducted pursuant to Section 701 or 702 to determine whether a minor is a person described in Section 601 or 602, the minor has a privilege against self-incrimination and has a right to confrontation by, and cross-examination of, witnesses.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1355.)
-------------------------------------------

705.

Whenever the court, before or during the hearing on the petition, is of the opinion that the minor is mentally disordered or if the court is in doubt concerning the mental health of any such person, the court may proceed as provided in Section 6550 of this code or Section 4011.6 of the Penal Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 445.)
-------------------------------------------

706.

After finding that a minor is a person described in Section 601 or 602, the court shall hear evidence on the question of the proper disposition to be made of the minor. The court shall receive in evidence the social study of the minor made by the probation officer and any other relevant and material evidence that may be offered, including any written or oral statement offered by the victim, the parent or guardian of the victim if
 the victim is a minor, or if the victim has died or is incapacitated, the victim’s next of kin, as authorized by subdivision (b) of Section 656.2. In addition, if the probation officer has recommended that the minor be transferred to the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, Division of Juvenile Justice pursuant to an adjudication for an offense requiring him or her to register as a sex offender pursuant to Section 290.008 of the Penal Code, the SARATSO selected pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 290.04 of the Penal Code shall be used to assess the minor, and the court shall receive that risk assessment score into evidence. In any judgment and order of disposition, the court shall state that the social study made by the probation officer has been read and that the social study and any statement has been considered by the court.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 582, Sec. 6.   (SB 325)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

706.5.

(a) If placement in foster care is recommended by the probation officer, or where the minor is already in foster care placement or pending placement pursuant to an earlier order, the social study prepared by the probation officer that is received into evidence at disposition pursuant to Section 706 shall include a case plan, as described in Section 706.6. If the court elects to hold the first status review at the disposition hearing, the social study shall also include, but not be limited to, the factual material described in subdivision (c).

(b) If placement in foster care is not recommended by the probation officer prior to disposition, but the court orders foster care placement, the court shall order the probation officer to prepare a case plan, as described
 in Section 706.6, within 30 days of the placement order. The case plan shall be filed with the court.

(c) At each status review hearing, the social study shall include, but not be limited to, an updated case plan as described in Section 706.6 and the following information:

(1) (A) The continuing necessity for and appropriateness of the placement.

(B) On and after October 1, 2021, for the minor or nonminor dependent whose placement in a short-term residential therapeutic program has been reviewed and approved, and, on and after July 1, 2022, for the minor or nonminor dependent whose placement in a community treatment facility has been reviewed and approved, pursuant to Section 727.12, the social study shall include evidence of each of the following:

(i) Ongoing assessment of the strengths and needs of the minor or nonminor dependent continues to support the determination that the needs of the minor or nonminor dependent cannot be met by family members or in another family-based setting, placement in a short-term residential therapeutic program or community treatment facility, as applicable, continues to provide the most effective and appropriate level of care in the least restrictive environment, and the placement is consistent with the short- and long-term mental and behavioral health goals and permanency plan for the minor or nonminor dependent.

(ii) Documentation of the minor or nonminor dependent’s specific treatment or service needs that will be met in the placement, and the length of time the minor or nonminor dependent is expected to need the treatment or services. For a Medi-Cal beneficiary, the determination of services
 and expected length of time for those services funded by Medi-Cal shall be based upon medical necessity and on all other state and federal Medi-Cal requirements, and shall be reflected in the documentation.

(iii) Documentation of the intensive and ongoing efforts made by the probation department, consistent with the minor or nonminor dependent’s permanency plan, to prepare the minor or nonminor dependent to return home or to be placed with a fit and willing relative, a legal guardian, an adoptive parent, in a resource family home, tribally approved home, or in another appropriate family-based setting, or, in the case of a nonminor dependent, in a supervised independent living setting.

(2) The extent of the probation department’s compliance with the case plan in making reasonable efforts to safely return the minor to the minor’s home or to complete whatever steps are necessary to
 finalize the permanent placement of the minor.

(3) The extent of progress that has been made by the minor and parent or guardian toward alleviating or mitigating the causes necessitating placement in foster care.

(4) If the first permanency planning hearing has not yet occurred, the social study shall include the likely date by which the minor may be returned to and safely maintained in the home or placed for adoption, appointed a legal guardian, permanently placed with a fit and willing relative, or referred to another planned permanent living arrangement.

(5) Whether the minor has been or will be referred to educational services and what services the minor is receiving, including special education and related services if the minor has exceptional needs as described in Part 30 (commencing with Section 56000) of
 Division 4 of Title 2 of the Education Code or accommodations if the child has disabilities as described in Chapter 16 (commencing with Section 701) of Title 29 of the United States Code Annotated. The probation officer or child advocate shall solicit comments from the appropriate local education agency prior to completion of the social study.

(6) If the parent or guardian is unwilling or unable to participate in making an educational or developmental services decision for their child, or if other circumstances exist that compromise the ability of the parent or guardian to make educational or developmental services decisions for the child, the probation department shall consider whether the right of the parent or guardian to make educational or developmental services decisions for the minor should be limited. If the study makes that recommendation, it shall identify whether there is a responsible adult available to make educational or
 developmental services decisions for the minor pursuant to Section 726.

(7) When the minor is 16 years of age or older and in another planned permanent living arrangement, the social study shall include a description of all of the following:

(A) The intensive and ongoing efforts to return the minor to the home of the parent, place the minor for adoption, or establish a legal guardianship, as appropriate.

(B) The steps taken to do both of the following:

(i) Ensure that the minor’s care provider is following the reasonable and prudent parent standard.

(ii) Determine whether the minor has regular, ongoing opportunities to engage in age or developmentally appropriate activities, including
 consulting with the minor about opportunities for the minor to participate in the activities.

(8) When the minor is under 16 years of age and has a permanent plan of return home, adoption, legal guardianship, or placement with a fit and willing relative, the social study shall include a description of any barriers to achieving the permanent plan and the efforts made by the agency to address those barriers.

(9) (A) For a child who is 10 years of age or older and has been declared a ward of the juvenile court pursuant to Section 601 or 602 for a year or longer, the information in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (h) of Section 366.1.

(B) For a child who is 10 years of age or older, whether the probation officer has informed the minor or nonminor dependent of the information in
 paragraph (2) of subdivision (h) of Section 366.1.

(C) This paragraph does not affect any applicable confidentiality law.

(10) For a child who is 16 years of age or older or for a nonminor dependent, whether the probation officer has, pursuant to the requirements of paragraph (22) of subdivision (g) of Section 16501.1, identified the person or persons who shall be responsible for assisting the child or nonminor dependent with applications for postsecondary education and related financial aid, or that the child or nonminor dependent stated that they do not want to pursue postsecondary education, including career or technical education.

(11) A copy of each child and family team action plan, as required by subparagraph (B) of paragraph
 (5) of subdivision (a) of Section 16501, that is completed on or after January 1, 2026, and was not previously provided to the court.

(d) At each permanency planning hearing, the social study shall include, but not be limited to, an updated case plan as described in Section 706.6, the factual material described in subdivision (c) of this section, and a recommended permanent plan for the minor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 79, Sec. 6.   (SB 119)   Effective July 29, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

706.6.

(a) Services to minors are best provided in a framework that integrates service planning and delivery among multiple service systems, including the mental health system, using a team-based approach, such as a child and family team. A child and family team brings together individuals that engage with the child or youth and family in assessing, planning, and delivering services. Use of a team approach increases efficiency, and thus reduces cost, by increasing coordination of formal services and integrating the natural and informal supports available to the child or youth and family.

(b) (1) For the purposes of this section, “child and family team” has the same meaning as in paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 16501.

(2) In its development of the case plan, the probation agency shall consider and document any recommendations of the child and family team, as defined in paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 16501. The agency shall document the rationale for any inconsistencies between the case plan and the child and family team recommendations.

(c) A case plan prepared as required by Section 706.5 shall be submitted to the court. It shall either be attached to the social study or incorporated as a separate section within the social study. The case plan shall include, but not be limited to, the following information:

(1) A description of the circumstances that resulted in the minor being placed under the supervision of the probation department and in foster care.

(2) Documentation of the preplacement assessment of the minor’s and family’s strengths and service needs showing that preventive services have been provided, and that reasonable efforts to prevent out-of-home placement have been made. The assessment shall include the type of placement best equipped to meet those needs.

(3) (A) A description of the type of home or institution in which the minor is to be placed, and the reasons for that placement decision, including a discussion of the safety and appropriateness of the placement, including the recommendations of the child and family team, if available.

(B) An appropriate placement is a placement in the least restrictive, most family-like environment that promotes normal childhood experiences, in closest proximity to the minor’s home, that meets the minor’s best interests and special needs.

(4) Effective January 1, 2010, to ensure the educational stability of the child while in foster care, both of the following:

(A) Information providing assurances that the placement agency has taken into account the appropriateness of the current educational setting and the proximity to the school in which the child is enrolled at the time of placement.

(B) Information providing assurances that the placement agency has coordinated with appropriate local educational agencies to ensure that the child remains in the school in which the child is enrolled at the time of placement, or, if remaining in that school is not in the best interests of the child, that the placement agency and the local educational agency are to provide immediate and appropriate enrollment in a new school and provide all of the child’s educational
 records to the new school.

(5) Specific time-limited goals and related activities designed to enable the safe return of the minor to the minor’s home, or in the event that return to the minor’s home is not possible, activities designed to result in permanent placement or emancipation. Specific responsibility for carrying out the planned activities shall be assigned to one or more of the following:

(A) The probation department.

(B) The minor’s parent or parents or legal guardian or guardians, as applicable.

(C) The minor.

(D) The foster parents or licensed agency providing foster care.

(6) The projected date of completion of
 the case plan objectives and the date services will be terminated.

(7) (A) Scheduled visits between the minor and the minor’s family and an explanation if no visits are made.

(B) Whether the child has other siblings, and, if any siblings exist, all of the following:

(i) The nature of the relationship between the child and the child’s siblings.

(ii) The appropriateness of developing or maintaining the sibling relationships under Section 16002.

(iii) If the siblings are not placed together in the same home, why the siblings are not placed together and what efforts are being made to place the siblings together, or why those efforts are not appropriate.

(iv) If the siblings are not placed together, all of the following:

(I) The frequency and nature of the visits between the siblings.

(II) If there are visits between the siblings, whether the visits are supervised or unsupervised. If the visits are supervised, a discussion of the reasons why the visits are supervised, and what needs to be accomplished in order for the visits to be unsupervised.

(III) If there are visits between the siblings, a description of the location and length of the visits.

(IV) Any plan to increase visitation between the siblings.

(v) The impact of the sibling relationships on the child’s placement and
 planning for legal permanence.

(vi) The continuing need to suspend sibling interaction, if applicable, under subdivision (c) of Section 16002.

(C) The factors the court may consider in making a determination regarding the nature of the child’s sibling relationships may include, but are not limited to, whether the siblings were raised together in the same home, whether the siblings have shared significant common experiences or have existing close and strong bonds, whether either sibling expresses a desire to visit or live with the child’s sibling, as applicable, and whether ongoing contact is in the child’s best emotional interests.

(8) (A) When placement is made in a resource family home, short-term residential therapeutic program, or other children’s residential facility that is either a
 substantial distance from the home of the minor’s parent or legal guardian or out of state, the case plan shall specify the reasons why the placement is the most appropriate and is in the best interest of the minor.

(B) When an out-of-state residential facility placement is recommended or made, the case plan shall comply with Section 727.1 of this code and Section 7911.1 of the Family Code. In addition, the case plan shall include documentation that the county placing agency has satisfied Section 16010.9. The case plan also shall address what in-state services or facilities were used or considered and why they were not recommended.

(9) If applicable, efforts to make it possible to place siblings together, unless it has been determined that placement together is not in the best interest of one or more siblings.

(10) A
 schedule of visits between the minor and the probation officer, including a monthly visitation schedule for those children placed in short-term residential therapeutic programs or out-of-state residential facilities, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 7910 of the Family Code.

(11) Health and education information about the minor, school records, immunizations, known medical problems, and any known medications the minor may be taking, names and addresses of the minor’s health and educational providers; the minor’s grade level performance; assurances that the minor’s placement in foster care takes into account proximity to the school in which the minor was enrolled at the time of placement; and other relevant health and educational information.

(12) When out-of-home services are used and the goal is reunification, the case plan shall describe the services that were provided to
 prevent removal of the minor from the home, those services to be provided to assist in reunification and the services to be provided concurrently to achieve legal permanency if efforts to reunify fail.

(13) (A) For a permanency planning hearing, an updated recommendation for a permanent plan for the minor. The identified permanent plan for a minor under 16 years of age shall be to return home, adoption, legal guardianship, or placement with a fit and willing relative. The case plan shall identify any barriers to achieving legal permanence and the steps the agency will take to address those barriers.

(B) If, after considering reunification, adoptive placement, legal guardianship, or permanent placement with a fit and willing relative the probation officer recommends placement in a planned permanent living arrangement for a minor 16 years of age or older, the
 case plan shall include documentation of a compelling reason or reasons why termination of parental rights is not in the minor’s best interest. For purposes of this subdivision, a “compelling reason” shall have the same meaning as in subdivision (c) of Section 727.3. The case plan shall also identify the intensive and ongoing efforts to return the minor to the home of the parent, place the minor for adoption, establish a legal guardianship, or place the minor with a fit and willing relative, as appropriate. Efforts shall include the use of technology, including social media, to find biological family members of the minor.

(14) For each review hearing, an updated description of the services that have been provided to the minor under the plan and an evaluation of the appropriateness and effectiveness of those services.

(15) A statement that the parent or legal guardian and the minor
 have had an opportunity to participate in the development of the case plan, to review the case plan, to sign the case plan, and to receive a copy of the plan, or an explanation of why the parent, legal guardian, or minor was not able to participate or sign the case plan.

(16) For a minor in out-of-home care who is 14 years of age or older, a written description of the programs and services, which will help the minor prepare for the transition from foster care to successful adulthood.

(17) On and after the date required by paragraph (9) of subdivision (h) of Section 11461:

(A) The minor’s tier, if applicable, as determined by the IP-CANS assessment for purposes of the Tiered Rate Structure under subdivision (h) of Section 11461.

(B) If applicable, the
 plan to meet the minor’s immediate needs, as defined in paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) of Section 16562, using funding made available for that purpose.

(C) The strengths building activities the minor is engaged in, or desires to be engaged in, a brief description of the strengths building goals identified in the IP-CANS, and the Spending Plan Report, as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 16565, for a minor eligible for the Strengths Building Child and Family Determination Program established in Section 16565.

(d) The following shall apply:

(1) The agency selecting a placement shall consider, in order of priority:

(A) Placement with relatives, nonrelated extended family members, and tribal members.

(B) Foster family homes and certified homes or resource families of foster family agencies.

(C) Treatment and intensive treatment certified homes or resource families of foster family agencies, or multidimensional treatment foster homes or therapeutic foster care homes.

(D) Group care placements in the following order:

(i) Short-term residential therapeutic programs.

(ii) Group homes vendored by a regional center.

(iii) Community treatment facilities.

(iv) Out-of-state residential facilities as authorized by subdivision (b) of Section 727.1.

(2) In
 an Indian child custody proceeding as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 224.1, the placement shall comply with the placement preferences set forth in Section 361.31.

(3) Although the placement options shall be considered in the preferential order specified in paragraph (1), the placement of a child may be with any of these placement settings in order to ensure the selection of a safe placement setting that is in the child’s best interests and meets the child’s special needs.

(4) (A) A minor may be placed into a community care facility licensed as a short-term residential therapeutic program, as defined in subdivision (ad) of Section 11400, provided the case plan indicates that the placement is for the purposes of providing short-term, specialized, intensive, and trauma-informed treatment for the minor, the case plan specifies the need for, nature of, and
 anticipated duration of this treatment, and the case plan includes transitioning the minor to a less restrictive environment and the projected timeline by which the minor will be transitioned to a less restrictive environment.

(B) On and after October 1, 2021, within 30 days of the minor’s placement in a short-term residential therapeutic program, and, on and after July 1, 2022, within 30 days of the minor’s placement in a community treatment facility, the case plan shall document all of the following:

(i) The reasonable and good faith effort by the probation officer to identify and include all required individuals in the child and family team.

(ii) All contact information for members of the child and family team, as well as contact information for other relatives and nonrelative extended family members who are not
 part of the child and family team.

(iii) Evidence that meetings of the child and family team, including the meetings related to the determination required under Section 4096, are held at a time and place convenient for the family.

(iv) If reunification is the goal, evidence that the parent from whom the minor or nonminor dependent was removed provided input on the members of the child and family team.

(v) Evidence that the determination required under Section 4096 was conducted in conjunction with the child and family team.

(vi) The placement preferences of the minor or nonminor dependent and the child and family team relative to the determination and, if the placement preferences of the minor or nonminor dependent or the child and family team are not
 the placement setting recommended by the qualified individual conducting the determination, the reasons why the preferences of the team or minor or nonminor dependent were not recommended.

(C) Following the court review required pursuant to Section 727.12, the case plan shall document the court’s approval or disapproval of the placement.

(D) When the minor or nonminor dependent has been placed in a short-term residential therapeutic program or a community treatment facility for more than 12 consecutive months or 18 nonconsecutive months, or, in the case of a minor who has not attained 13 years of age, for more than 6 consecutive or nonconsecutive months, the case plan shall include both of the following:

(i) Documentation of the information submitted to the court pursuant to subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of
 subdivision (c) of Section 706.5.

(ii) Documentation that the chief probation officer of the county probation department, or their designee, has approved the continued placement of the minor or nonminor dependent in the setting.

(E) (i) On and after October 1, 2021, prior to discharge from a short-term residential therapeutic program, and, on and after July 1, 2022, prior to discharge from a community treatment facility, the case plan shall include a description of the type of in-home or institution-based services to encourage the safety, stability, and appropriateness of the next placement, including the recommendations of the child and family team, if available.

(ii) A plan, developed in collaboration with the short-term residential therapeutic program or community treatment facility, as
 applicable, for the provision of discharge planning and family-based aftercare support pursuant to Section 4096.6.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 67, Sec. 188.   (AB 1170)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

707.

(a) (1) In any case in which a minor is alleged to be a person described in Section 602 by reason of the violation, when the minor was 16 years of age or older, of any offense listed in subdivision (b) or any other felony criminal statute, the district attorney or other appropriate prosecuting officer may make a motion to transfer the minor from juvenile court to a court of criminal jurisdiction. The motion shall be made prior to the attachment of jeopardy. Upon the motion, the juvenile court shall order the probation officer to submit a report on the behavioral patterns and social history of the minor. The report shall include any written or oral statement offered by the victim pursuant to Section 656.2.

(2) In any case in which an individual is alleged to be a person described in Section 602 by reason of the violation, when the individual was 14 or 15 years of age, of any offense listed in subdivision (b), but was not apprehended prior to the end of juvenile court jurisdiction, the district attorney or other appropriate prosecuting officer may make a motion to transfer the individual from juvenile court to a court of criminal jurisdiction. The motion shall be made prior to the attachment of jeopardy. Upon the motion, the juvenile court shall order the probation officer to submit a report on the behavioral patterns and social history of the individual. The report shall include any written or oral statement offered by the victim pursuant to Section 656.2.

(3) Following submission
 and consideration of the report, and of any other relevant evidence that the petitioner or the minor may wish to submit, the juvenile court shall decide whether the minor should be transferred to a court of criminal jurisdiction. In order to find that the minor should be transferred to a court of criminal jurisdiction, the court shall find by clear and convincing evidence that the minor is not amenable to rehabilitation while under the jurisdiction of the juvenile court. In making its decision, the court shall consider the criteria specified in subparagraphs (A) to (E), inclusive. If the court orders a transfer of jurisdiction, the court shall recite the basis for its decision in an order entered upon the minutes, which shall include the reasons supporting the court’s finding that the minor is not amenable to rehabilitation while under the jurisdiction of the juvenile court. In any case in which a hearing has
 been noticed pursuant to this section, the court shall postpone the taking of a plea to the petition until the conclusion of the transfer hearing, and a plea that has been entered already shall not constitute evidence at the hearing.

(A) (i) The degree of criminal sophistication exhibited by the minor.

(ii) When evaluating the criterion specified in clause (i), the juvenile court shall give weight to any relevant factor, including, but not limited to, the minor’s age, maturity, intellectual capacity, and physical, mental, and emotional health at the time of the alleged offense; the minor’s impetuosity or failure to appreciate risks and consequences of criminal behavior; the effect of familial, adult, or peer pressure on the minor’s actions; the effect of
 the minor’s family and community environment; the existence of childhood trauma; the minor’s involvement in the child welfare or foster care system; and the status of the minor as a victim of human trafficking, sexual abuse, or sexual battery on the minor’s criminal sophistication.

(B) (i) Whether the minor can be rehabilitated prior to the expiration of the juvenile court’s jurisdiction.

(ii) When evaluating the criterion specified in clause (i), the juvenile court shall give weight to any relevant factor, including, but not limited to, the minor’s potential to grow and mature.

(C) (i) The minor’s previous delinquent history.

(ii) When evaluating the criterion specified in clause (i), the juvenile court shall give weight to any relevant factor, including, but not limited to, the seriousness of the minor’s previous delinquent history and the effect of the minor’s family and community environment and childhood trauma on the minor’s previous delinquent behavior.

(D) (i) Success of previous attempts by the juvenile court to rehabilitate the minor.

(ii) When evaluating the criterion specified in clause (i), the juvenile court shall give weight to any relevant factor, including, but not limited to, the adequacy of the services previously provided to address the minor’s needs.

(E) (i) The
 circumstances and gravity of the offense alleged in the petition to have been committed by the minor.

(ii) When evaluating the criterion specified in clause (i), the juvenile court shall give weight to any relevant factor, including, but not limited to, the actual behavior of the person, the mental state of the person, the person’s degree of involvement in the crime, the level of harm actually caused by the person, and the person’s mental and emotional development.

(iii) When evaluating the criterion specified in clause (i), the court shall consider evidence offered that indicates that the person against whom the minor is accused of committing an offense trafficked, sexually abused, or sexually battered the minor.

(b) This
 subdivision is applicable to any case in which a minor is alleged to be a person described in Section 602 by reason of the violation of one of the following offenses:

(1) Murder.

(2) Arson, as provided in subdivision (a) or (b) of Section 451 of the Penal Code.

(3) Robbery.

(4) Rape with force, violence, or threat of great bodily harm.

(5) Sodomy by force, violence, duress, menace, or threat of great bodily harm.

(6) A lewd or lascivious act as provided in subdivision (b) of Section 288 of the Penal Code.

(7) Oral copulation by force, violence, duress, menace, or threat of great bodily harm.

(8) An offense specified in subdivision (a) of Section 289 of the Penal Code.

(9) Kidnapping for ransom.

(10) Kidnapping for purposes of robbery.

(11) Kidnapping with bodily harm.

(12) Attempted murder.

(13) Assault with a firearm or destructive device.

(14) Assault by any means of force likely to produce great bodily injury.

(15) Discharge of a firearm into an inhabited or occupied building.

(16) An offense described in Section 1203.09 of the Penal Code.

(17) An offense described in Section 12022.5 or 12022.53 of the Penal Code.

(18) A felony offense in which the minor personally used a weapon described in any provision listed in Section 16590 of the Penal Code.

(19) A felony offense described in Section 136.1 or 137 of the Penal Code.

(20) Manufacturing, compounding, or selling one-half ounce or more of a salt or solution of a controlled substance
 specified in subdivision (e) of Section 11055 of the Health and Safety Code.

(21) A violent felony, as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 667.5 of the Penal Code, which also would constitute a felony violation of subdivision (b) of Section 186.22 of the Penal Code.

(22) Escape, by the use of force or violence, from a county juvenile hall, home, ranch, camp, or forestry camp in violation of subdivision (b) of Section 871 if great bodily injury is intentionally inflicted upon an employee of the juvenile facility during the commission of the escape.

(23) Torture as described in Sections 206 and 206.1 of the Penal Code.

(24) Aggravated mayhem, as described in
 Section 205 of the Penal Code.

(25) Carjacking, as described in Section 215 of the Penal Code, while armed with a dangerous or deadly weapon.

(26) Kidnapping for purposes of sexual assault, as punishable in subdivision (b) of Section 209 of the Penal Code.

(27) Kidnapping as punishable in Section 209.5 of the Penal Code.

(28) The offense described in subdivision (c) of Section 26100 of the Penal Code.

(29) The offense described in Section 18745 of the Penal Code.

(30) Voluntary manslaughter, as described in subdivision (a) of
 Section 192 of the Penal Code.
